Connecticut, session 2026, HB05285.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subdivision (7) of subsection (b) of section 12-63 of the 2026
2 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
3 substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026, and applicable to
4 assessment years commencing on or after October 1, 2026):
5 (7) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this subdivision,
6 for assessment years commencing on or after October 1, 2024, the
7 following schedule of depreciation shall be applicable with respect to
8 motor vehicles based on the manufacturer's suggested retail price of
9 such motor vehicles, provided no motor vehicle manufactured nineteen
10 or fewer years prior to the assessment year for which it is assessed shall
11 be assessed at an amount less than five hundred dollars:
T1 Percentage of
T2 Manufacturer's Suggested
T3 Age of Vehicle Retail Price
LCO No. 1265 1 of 4

Raised Bill No. 5285
T4
T5 Up to year one Eighty-five per cent
T6 Year two Eighty per cent
T7 Year three Seventy-five per cent
T8 Year four Seventy per cent
T9 Year five Sixty-five per cent
T10 Year six Sixty per cent
T11 Year seven Fifty-five per cent
T12 Year eight Fifty per cent
T13 Year nine Forty-five per cent
T14 Year ten Forty per cent
T15 Year eleven Thirty-five per cent
T16 Year twelve Thirty per cent
T17 Year thirteen Twenty-five per cent
T18 Year fourteen Twenty per cent
T19 Years fifteen to nineteen Fifteen per cent
T20 Years twenty and beyond [Not less than
T21 five hundred dollars] Ten per
cent or five hundred dollars,
whichever is less
12 (B) For assessment years commencing on or after October 1, 2024, any
13 municipality may, by vote of its legislative body, or in a municipality
14 where the legislative body is a town meeting, by vote of its board of
15 selectmen, elect to apply the following modified schedule of
16 depreciation with respect to motor vehicles based on the manufacturer's
17 suggested retail price of such motor vehicles, provided no motor vehicle
18 manufactured nineteen or fewer years prior to the assessment year for
19 which it is assessed shall be assessed at an amount less than five
20 hundred dollars:
T22 Percentage of
T23 Manufacturer's Suggested
LCO No. 1265 2 of 4

Raised Bill No. 5285
T24 Age of Vehicle Retail Price
T25
T26 Up to year one Ninety per cent
T27 Year two Eighty-five per cent
T28 Year three Eighty per cent
T29 Year four Seventy-five per cent
T30 Year five Seventy per cent
T31 Year six Sixty-five per cent
T32 Year seven Sixty per cent
T33 Year eight Fifty-five per cent
T34 Year nine Fifty per cent
T35 Year ten Forty-five per cent
T36 Year eleven Forty per cent
T37 Year twelve Thirty-five per cent
T38 Year thirteen Thirty per cent
T39 Year fourteen Twenty-five per cent
T40 Years fifteen to nineteen Twenty per cent
T41 Years twenty and beyond [Not less than
T42 five hundred dollars] Fifteen
per cent or five hundred
dollars, whichever is less
21 Any municipality that elects to apply the modified schedule of
22 depreciation described in this subparagraph shall, not later than
23 fourteen days after such election, notify the Secretary of the Office of
24 Policy and Management, in a form and manner prescribed by the
25 secretary, of such election and the first assessment year for which such
26 schedule shall be effective.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
LCO No. 1265 3 of 4

Raised Bill No. 5285
Section 1 October 1, 2026, and 12-63(b)(7)
applicable to assessment
years commencing on or
after October 1, 2026